bg-BG: Съвместима мензура на китара: Баритон; Мултимензура/разперени прагчета; Къса мензура; Стандартна/дълга мензура; Универсална/непосочена; Друго
pt-BR: Comprimento do braço da guitarra compatível: Barítono; Compatível com multiescala/fanned fret; Escala curta; Escala padrão/longa; Universal/não especificado; Outro
en: Compatible guitar scale length: Baritone; Multi-scale/Fanned fret compatible; Short scale; Standard/long scale; Universal/unspecified; Other
ja: 対応ギタースケール長さ: バリトン; マルチスケール/ファンドフレット対応; ショートスケール; スタンダード/ロングスケール; ユニバーサル/指定なし; その他
sv: Kompatibel gitarrskalelängd: Baryton; Multiskala/fanned fret-kompatibel; Kort mensur; Standard/lång mensur; Universell/ospecificerad; Övrigt
cs: Kompatibilní menzura kytary: Baryton; Kompatibilní s multi-scale / fanned fret; Krátká menzura; Standardní/dlouhá menzura; Univerzální/nespecifikováno; Jiné
nl: Compatibele gitaarschaallengte: Bariton; Compatibel met multi-scale/fanned fret; Short-scale; Standaard/long-scale; Universeel/ongespecificeerd; Overig
ro-RO: Lungimea diapazonului de chitară compatibilă: Bariton; Compatibil cu multi-scală / taste în evantai; Scală scurtă; Scală standard / lungă; Universal / nespecificat; Altele
de: Kompatible Mensur: Bariton; Kompatibel mit Multiscale/Fanned Frets; Shortscale; Standard/Longscale; Universal/Nicht spezifiziert; Sonstige
hu: Kompatibilis gitárskála hossza: Bariton; Többmenzúrás/legyezőbundos kompatibilis; Rövid menzúra; Normál/hosszú menzúra; Univerzális/meghatározatlan; Egyéb
sl-SI: Združljiva dolžina menzure kitare: Bariton; Več menzur/pahljačaste prečke; Kratka menzura; Standardna/dolga menzura; Univerzalno/nedoločeno; Drugo
hr-HR: Kompatibilna duljina skale za gitaru: Bariton; Kompatibilno s više skala / lepezastim pragovima; Kratka skala; Standardna/duga skala; Univerzalno/neodređeno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kompatibilná dĺžka menzúry gitary: Barytónová menzúra; Kompatibilné s multi-scale/vejárovými pražcami; Krátka menzúra; Štandardná/dlhá menzúra; Univerzálna/nešpecifikovaná; Iné
zh-CN: 适用吉他琴弦长度: 上低音; 兼容多有效弦长/扇形品; 短弦长; 标准/长弦长; 通用/未指定; 其他
ru: Совместимая мензура гитары: Баритон; Мультимензура / веерные лады; Укороченная мензура; Стандартная / увеличенная мензура; Универсальная / не указана; Другое
pt-PT: Comprimento do braço da guitarra compatível: Barítono; Multiescala/compatível com trastes em leque; Escala curta; Escala padrão/longa; Universal/não especificado; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinamo ilgio gitaros menzūra: Baritonas; Kelių menzūrų / vėduoklinių skirsnių; Trumpa menzūra; Standartinė / ilga menzūra; Universali / nenurodyta; Kita
da: Kompatibel længde på guitarskala: Baryton; Kompatibel med multiskala/fanned frets; Kort skala; Standard/lang skala; Universel/uspecificeret; Andet
nb: Kompatibel gitarskalalengde: Baryton; Kompatibel med multiskala / fanned fret; Kort skala; Standard / lang skala; Universell/uspesifisert; Annet
ko: 호환 기타 스케일 길이: 바리톤; 멀티 스케일/팬드 프렛 호환; 숏 스케일; 스탠다드/롱 스케일; 범용/미지정; 기타
pl: Zgodna długość skali gitary: Barytonowa; Zmienna menzura / Fanned fret; Krótka menzura; Standardowa / długa menzura; Uniwersalna / nieokreślona; Inne
fr: Longueur de manche compatible: Baryton; Compatible multi-diapason/frettes en éventail; Diapason court; Diapason standard/long; Universel/non spécifié; Autre
el: Συμβατό μήκος κλίμακας κιθάρας: Βαρύτονη; Συμβατότητα με multi-scale/fanned fret; Short scale; Standard/long scale; Γενικής χρήσης/μη καθορισμένο; Άλλο
vi: Chiều dài thang âm guitar tương thích: Baritone; Tương thích đa âm giai (multi-scale)/phím quạt (fanned fret); Âm giai ngắn (Short scale); Âm giai tiêu chuẩn/dài; Phổ thông/Không xác định; Khác
zh-TW: 相容吉他有效弦長: 上低音 (Baritone); 相容多重弦長/扇形指板; 短弦長; 標準/長弦長; 通用/未指定; 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva kitaran mensuuripituus: Baritoni; Multi-scale / Fanned fret -yhteensopiva; Lyhyt skaala; Vakio- / pitkä skaala; Yleinen / ei määritetty; Muu
tr: Uyumlu gitar skala uzunluğu: Bariton; Çoklu ölçek/Yelpaze perde uyumlu; Kısa ölçek; Standart/uzun ölçek; Evrensel/belirtilmemiş; Diğer
es: Largo de escala de guitarra compatible: Barítono; Compatible con multiescala/trastes en abanico; Escala corta; Escala estándar/larga; Universal/no especificado; Otro
it: Lunghezza della scala della chitarra compatibile: Baritona; Compatibile con multiscala/fanned fret; Scala corta; Scala standard/lunga; Universale/non specificata; Altro
th: ความยาวสเกลกีตาร์ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: Baritone; รองรับ Multi-scale/Fanned fret; Short scale; Standard/long scale; อเนกประสงค์/ไม่ระบุ; อื่นๆ